Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.450

Violence de-escalation training.

(1) Beginning one year after December 6, 2018, all law enforcement officers in the state of Washington must receive violence de-escalation training. Law enforcement officers beginning employment after December 6, 2018, must successfully complete such training within the first 15 months of employment. The commission shall set the date by which other law enforcement officers must successfully complete such training.

(2) All law enforcement officers shall periodically receive continuing violence de-escalation training to practice their skills, update their knowledge and training, and learn about new legal requirements and violence de-escalation strategies.

(3) The commission shall set training requirements through the procedures in RCW 43.101.455.

(4) Violence de-escalation training provided under this section must be consistent with RCW 10.120.020 and the model policies established by the attorney general under RCW 10.120.030.

(5) The commission shall submit a report to the legislature and the governor by January 1st and July 1st of each year on the implementation of and compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The report must include data on compliance by agencies and officers. The report may also include recommendations for any changes to laws and policies necessary to improve compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 2021 c 324 s 6; 2019 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

NOTES:

Intent—2021 c 324: See note following RCW 10.120.010.

Short title—2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): "This act may be known and cited as the law enforcement training and community safety act." [ 2019 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

Intent—2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): "The intent of the people in enacting this act is to make our communities safer. This is accomplished by requiring law enforcement officers to obtain violence de-escalation and mental health training, so that officers will have greater skills to resolve conflicts without the use of physical or deadly force. Law enforcement officers will receive first aid training and be required to render first aid, which will save lives and be a positive point of contact between law enforcement officers and community members to increase trust and reduce conflicts. Finally, the initiative adopts a "good faith" standard for officer criminal liability in those exceptional circumstances where deadly force is used, so that officers using deadly force in carrying out their duties in good faith will not face prosecution." [ 2019 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

Liberal construction—2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): "The provisions of this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of this act. Nothing in this act precludes local jurisdictions or law enforcement agencies from enacting additional training requirements or requiring law enforcement officers to provide first aid in more circumstances than required by this act or guidelines adopted under this act." [ 2019 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

Subject—2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): "For constitutional purposes, the subject of this act is "law enforcement."" [ 2019 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

Rule making—2019 c 4; 2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): See note following RCW 43.101.455.